tests/ger_past.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "p1.sg cases": 
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px1sg><nom> : барбытым
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px1sg><acc> : барбыппын
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px1sg><dat> : барбыппар
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px1sg><abl> : барбыппыттан
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px1sg><ins> : барбыппынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px1sg><com> : барбыппыныын
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px1sg><comp> : барбыппынааҕар

    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px1sg><nom> : барбатаҕым
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px1sg><acc> : барбатахпын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px1sg><dat> : барбатахпар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px1sg><abl> : барбатахпыттан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px1sg><ins> : барбатахпынан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px1sg><com> : барбатахпыныын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px1sg><comp> : барбатахпынааҕар

  "p2.sg cases": 
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px2sg><nom> : барбытыҥ
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px2sg><acc> : барбыккын
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px2sg><dat> : барбыккар
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px2sg><abl> : барбыккыттан
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px2sg><ins> : барбыккынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px2sg><com> : барбыккыныын
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px2sg><comp> : барбыккынааҕар

    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px2sg><nom> : барбатаҕыҥ
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px2sg><acc> : барбатаххын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px2sg><dat> : барбатаххар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px2sg><abl> : барбатаххыттан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px2sg><ins> : барбатаххынан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px2sg><com> : барбатаххыныын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px2sg><comp> : барбатаххынааҕар

  "p3.sg cases": 
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px3sg><nom> : барбыта
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px3sg><acc> : барбытын
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px3sg><dat> : барбытыгар
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px3sg><abl> : барбытыттан
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px3sg><ins> : барбытынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px3sg><com> : барбытыныын
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px3sg><comp> : барбытынааҕар

    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px3sg><nom> : барбатаҕа
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px3sg><acc> : барбатаҕын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px3sg><dat> : барбатаҕар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px3sg><abl> : барбатаҕыттан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px3sg><ins> : барбатаҕынан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px3sg><com> : барбатаҕыныын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px3sg><comp> : барбатаҕынааҕар

  "p1.pl cases": 
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px1pl><nom> : барбыппыт
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px1pl><acc> : барбыппытын
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px1pl><dat> : барбыппытыгар
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px1pl><abl> : барбыппытыттан
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px1pl><ins> : барбыппытынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px1pl><com> : барбыппытыныын
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px1pl><comp> : барбыппытынааҕар

    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px1pl><nom> : барбатахпыт
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px1pl><acc> : барбатахпытын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px1pl><dat> : барбатахпытыгар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px1pl><abl> : барбатахпытыттан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px1pl><ins> : барбатахпытынан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px1pl><com> : барбатахпытыныын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px1pl><comp> : барбатахпытынааҕар

  "p2.pl cases": 
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px2pl><nom> : барбыккыт
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px2pl><acc> : барбыккытын
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px2pl><dat> : барбыккытыгар
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px2pl><abl> : барбыккытыттан
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px2pl><ins> : барбыккытынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px2pl><com> : барбыккытыныын
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px2pl><comp> : барбыккытынааҕар

    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px2pl><nom> : барбатаххыт
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px2pl><acc> : барбатаххытын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px2pl><dat> : барбатаххытыгар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px2pl><abl> : барбатаххытыттан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px2pl><ins> : барбатаххытынан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px2pl><com> : барбатаххытыныын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px2pl><comp> : барбатаххытынааҕар

  "p3.pl cases": 
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px3pl><nom> : барбыттара
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px3pl><acc> : барбыттарын
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px3pl><dat> : барбыттарыгар
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px3pl><abl> : барбыттарыттан
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px3pl><ins> : барбыттарынан
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px3pl><com> : барбыттарыныын
    бар<v><iv><ger_past><px3pl><comp> : барбыттарынааҕар

    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px3pl><nom> : барбатахтара
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px3pl><acc> : барбатахтарын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px3pl><dat> : барбатахтарыгар
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px3pl><abl> : барбатахтарыттан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px3pl><ins> : барбатахтарынан
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px3pl><com> : барбатахтарыныын
    бар<v><iv><neg><ger_past><px3pl><comp> : барбатахтарынааҕар
